Georgia, session 2025_26, HB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 6 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions
relative to aviation, is amended by revising Code Section 6-1-4, relating to unmanned aircraft
system defined, preemption for unmanned aircraft systems, and operations, as follows:
"6-1-4.
(a)(1) As used in this Code section, the term 'unmanned:
(1) 'Ticketed entertainment event' means any music, sporting, or performing arts event
held in a location with gated entries or barriers that prevent access to the general public
and in which a revocable license that has been issued by an owner, operator, or lessee of
such property is required for attendance at such event.
- 1 -

LC 39 4747S
(2) 'Unmanned aircraft system' means a:
(A) A powered, aerial vehicle that:
(A)(i) Does not carry a human operator and is operated without the possibility of
direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft;
(B)(ii) Uses aerodynamic forces to provide vehicle lift;
(C)(iii) Can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely; and
(D)(iv) Can be expendable or recoverable.; and
(2)(B) Such term shall not include a satellite.
(b) Any ordinance, resolution, regulation, or policy of any county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of this state regulating the testing or operation of unmanned aircraft
systems shall be deemed preempted and shall be null, void, and of no force and effect;
provided, however, that a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state
may:
(1) Enforce any ordinance that was adopted on or before April 1, 2017;
(2) Adopt an ordinance that enforces Federal Aviation Administration restrictions; or
(3) Adopt an ordinance that provides for or prohibits the launch or intentional landing
of an unmanned aircraft system from or on its public property except with respect to the
operation of an unmanned aircraft system for commercial purposes.
(c) The state, through agency or departmental rules and regulations, may provide for or
prohibit the launch or intentional landing of an unmanned aircraft system from or on its
public property.
(d)(1) It shall be unlawful to operate an unmanned aircraft system within 400 feet of or
above a ticketed entertainment event.
(2) A person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of the unauthorized operation
of an unmanned aircraft system and shall be punished as for a misdemeanor.
(3) This subsection shall not apply when a person who operates an unmanned aircraft
system:
- 2 -

LC 39 4747S
(A) Has obtained consent by any person with legal authority over a ticketed
entertainment event;
(B) Is authorized by federal regulations to operate an unmanned aircraft system and is
operating such system in a lawful manner and consistent with federal regulations;
(C) Is an employee of the property where the ticketed entertainment event is held and
is conducting official business; or
(D) Is an employee of a water, sewer, electrical, telephone, cable, or other regulated
utility service provider and is conducting official business."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 3 -